District of Columbia statutes.
51-131

Separation from employment due to domestic violence.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because the individual was separated from employment by discharge or voluntary or involuntary resignation due to domestic violence against the individual or any member of the individual’s immediate family, unless the individual was the perpetrator of the domestic violence.

(b)

For the purposes of this part, the term “domestic violence” shall have the same meaning as “intrafamily offense”, as defined in § 16-1001(8).

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 31
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 4(i), 56 DCR 1338
July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-192, § 2(d), 57 DCR 4500
D.C. Law 17-368 substituted “§ 16-1001(8)” for “§ 16-1001(5)”.
D.C. Law 18-192 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because the individual was separated from employment by discharge or voluntary or involuntary resignation due to domestic violence. For the purposes of this part, the term ‘domestic violence’ means an intrafamily offense as defined in § 16-1001(8).”